Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2624.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4904(c) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 4904. Limits on number of towed vehicles.* * *(c) Towing vehicles requiring service.--(1) A dolly not exceeding ten feet in length may be towed by a motor vehicle for the purpose of towing another vehicle requiring service.[(2) A combination requiring emergency service may be towed to a nearby garage or other place of safety.](c.1) Towing disabled combinations.--Subsection (a) shall 123456789101112131415161718192021 not apply to a wrecked or disabled combination being towed by a tow truck on a highway if the wrecked or disabled combination meets all of the following requirements:(1) The tow truck is towing the wrecked or disabled combination:(i) from the scene of an accident or other location where the combination is disabled;(ii) to a close and practical place of repairs or other place of safety within 75 miles; and(iii) by a safe and practical route.(2) The wrecked or disabled combination, including the tow truck, consists of no more than three vehicles, unless:(i) the wrecked or disabled combination needs to be towed in an emergency situation; and(ii) the tow truck operator is directed by emergency personnel or a qualified Commonwealth employee to move the wrecked or disabled combination exceeding three vehicles to the closest and practical place of safety.(c.2) Restricted bridges and highways.--A tow truck towing a wrecked or disabled combination shall comply with any weight or size restrictions imposed by the department or a local authority on a bridge or portion of a highway under section 4902 (relating to restrictions on use of highways and bridges).* * *Section 2. Section 4923(b.1)(7) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 4923. Length of vehicles.* * *(b.1) Combinations.--* * *20260HB2624PN3585 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [(7) A combination consisting of any tow truck towing a disabled motor vehicle to a place of repairs or other place of safety.]* * *Section 3. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4926. Application to tow trucks. (a) Size exemption.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the size restrictions specified in this subchapter do not apply to a tow truck towing a wrecked or disabled motor vehicle or combination that meets all of the following requirements:(1) The tow truck is towing the wrecked or disabled motor vehicle or combination:(i) from the scene of an accident or other location where the motor vehicle or combination is disabled;(ii) to a close and practical place of repairs or other place of safety within 75 miles; and(iii) by a safe and practical route.(2) The tow truck and the wrecked or disabled motor vehicle or combination comply with the size restrictions specified in this subchapter when each vehicle is measured separately.(b) Restricted bridges and highways.--A tow truck towing a wrecked or disabled motor vehicle or combination shall comply with any size restrictions imposed by the department or a local authority on a bridge or portion of a highway under section 4902 (relating to restrictions on use of highways and bridges).Section 4. Section 4949 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 4949. Application to tow trucks.[The] (a) Weight exemption.--Except as provided in subsection (b), the weight restrictions [set forth] specified in 20260HB2624PN3585 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this subchapter do not apply to a [combination consisting of any] tow truck towing a wrecked or disabled motor vehicle [to a place of repairs or other place of safety as long as the overweight combination travels directly to the first available such location and the movement is performed at the direction of authorized emergency personnel or a qualified Commonwealth employee.] or combination that meets all of the following requirements:(1) The tow truck is towing the wrecked or disabled motor vehicle or combination:(i) from the scene of an accident or other location where the motor vehicle or combination is disabled;(ii) to a close and practical place of repairs or other place of safety within 75 miles; and(iii) by a safe and practical route.(2) The tow truck and the wrecked or disabled motor vehicle or combination comply with the weight restrictions specified in this subchapter when each vehicle is weighed separately.(b) Restricted bridges and highways.--A tow truck towing a wrecked or disabled motor vehicle or combination shall comply with any weight restrictions imposed by the department or a local authority on a bridge or portion of a highway under section 4902 (relating to restrictions on use of highways and bridges).Section 5. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2624PN3585 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526